el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Επικοινωνίες > Τηλεφωνία > Αξεσουάρ τηλεφώνου: Συσκευές φραγής κλήσεων; Φίλτρα DSL; Τηλεφωνικές κάρτες; Ανταλλακτικά ακουστικά τηλεφώνου; Μονάδες επέκτασης & πλευρικές μονάδες τηλεφώνου; Καλώδια ακουστικού τηλεφώνου; Βάσεις & στηρίγματα τηλεφώνου; Διαχωριστές & προσαρμογείς τηλεφώνου
fi: Elektroniikka > Viestintä > Puhelinliikenne > Puhelintarvikkeet: Soitonestot; DSL-suodattimet; Puhelinkortit; Korvaavat puhelinluurit; Puhelimen laajennusmoduulit; Puhelinluurin johdot; Puhelimen kiinnikkeet ja telineet; Puhelinjako- ja sovittimet
nl: Elektronica > Communicatie > Telefonie > Telefoonaccessoires: Oproepblokkers; DSL Filters; Telefoonkaarten; Vervangende telefoonhoorns; Telefoon uitbreidings- en sidecar modules; Telefoonhoorn snoeren; Telefoon bevestigingen en beugels; Telefoon splitters en adapters
pl: Elektronika > Telekomunikacja > Telefonia > Akcesoria do telefonów: Blokady połączeń; Filtry DSL; Karty telefoniczne; Wymienne słuchawki telefoniczne; Moduły rozszerzenia i boczne aparatu telefonicznego; Przewody słuchawek telefonicznych; Mocowania i wsporniki telefoniczne; Rozdzielacze i adaptery telefoniczne
sk-SK: Elektronika > Komunikačné zariadenia > Telefonovanie > Príslušenstvo k telefónom: Blokátory hovorov; DSL filtre; Telefónne karty; Náhradné telefónne slúchadlá; Telefónové rozširujúce a vedľajšie moduly; Telefónové šnúry slúchadiel; Držiaky a konzoly telefónov; Telefónové rozdeľovače a adaptéry
sl-SI: Elektronika > Komunikacija > Telefonija > Dodatki za telefone: Blokiranje klicev; DSL-filtri; Telefonske kartice; Nadomestne telefonske slušalke; Razširitveni moduli za telefone; Kabli za telefonske slušalke; Nosilci in oklepi za telefone; Razdelilniki in adapterji za telefone
ru: Электроника > Связь > Телефония > Аксессуары для телефонов: Блокировщики вызовов; Фильтры DSL; Телефонные карточки; Сменные телефонные трубки; Модули расширения для телефонов; Шнуры телефонных трубок; Крепления и кронштейны для телефонов; Телефонные разветвители и адаптеры
nb: Elektronikk > Kommunikasjon > Telefoni > Telefontilbehør: Anropsblokkeringer; DSL-filtre; Telefonkort; Erstatnings-telefonrør; Uvidelses- og sidemoduler til telefon; Telefonrørledninger; Telefonfester og braketter; Telefonsplittere og adaptere
bg-BG: Електроника > Комуникации > Телефония > Аксесоари за телефони: Блокери на повиквания; DSL филтри; Телефонни карти; Резервни слушалки за телефон; Разширителни и странични модули за телефон; Кабели за телефонна слушалка; Стойки и скоби за телефон; Сплитери и адаптери за телефон
da: Elektronik > Kommunikation > Telefoni > Telefontilbehør: Opkaldsblokering; DSL-filtre; Telefonkort; Ekstra telefonhåndsæt; Telefon – udvidelses- og sidevognsmoduler; Telefon – håndsætledninger; Telefon – beslag; Telefon – fordelere og adaptere
hu: Elektronika > Kommunikáció > Telefonálás > Telefonkiegészítők: Hívásblokkolók; DSL-szűrők; Telefonkártyák; Cserélhető telefonkagylók; Telefonbővítő és oldalsó modulok; Telefonkagyló-kábelek; Telefontartók és -konzolok; Telefonelosztók és -adapterek
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Comunicações > Telefonia > Acessórios de telefone: Bloqueador de chamadas; Filtros DSL; Cartões de telefone; Auscultadores de substituição para telefone; Módulos de expansão e sidecar para telefone; Cabos para auscultador de telefone; Suportes e brackets para telefone; Divisores e adaptadores para telefone
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 通訊設備 > 電話設備 > 電話配件: 來電阻擋器; DSL 濾波器; 電話卡; 電話聽筒替換品; 電話擴充與副機模組; 電話聽筒線; 電話支架與托架; 電話分接器與轉接頭
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị liên lạc > Điện thoại > Phụ kiện điện thoại: Thiết bị chặn cuộc gọi; Bộ lọc DSL; Thẻ điện thoại; Tay gọi điện thoại thay thế; Mô-đun mở rộng và phụ kiện điện thoại; Dây tay gọi điện thoại; Giá và kẹp điện thoại; Bộ tách và bộ chuyển đổi điện thoại
tr: Elektronik > Haberleşme > Telefon İletişimi > Telefon Aksesuarları: Çağrı Engelleyiciler; DSL Filtreleri; Telefon Kartları; Yedek Telefon Ahizeleri; Telefon Genişletme ve Yardımcı Modülleri; Telefon Ahize Kabloları; Telefon Montaj ve Braketleri; Telefon Bölücüler ve Adaptörler
ja: 電子機器 > 通信機器 > 電話 > 電話関連用品: 着信拒否装置; DSLフィルター; テレホンカード; 電話機用交換受話器; 電話機用拡張モジュール（サイドカー）; 電話機受話器コード; 電話機用マウント・ブラケット; 電話スプリッター・アダプター
hr-HR: Elektronika > Komunikacija > Telefonija > Telefonski pribor: Blokatori poziva; DSL filtri; Telefonske kartice; Zamjenske telefonske slušalice; Telefonski moduli za proširenje i dodatke; Kabeli za telefonske slušalice; Nosači i držači za telefon; Telefonski razdjelnici i adapteri
it: Elettronica > Comunicazioni > Telefonia > Accessori per telefoni: Blocca-chiamate; Filtri DSL; Schede telefoniche; Cornette telefoniche di ricambio; Moduli di espansione e sidecar del telefono; Cavi del ricevitore telefonico; Supporti e staffe del telefono; Splitter e adattatori telefonici
cs: Elektronika > Komunikace > Telefony > Příslušenství k telefonům: Blokovače hovorů; DSL filtry; Telefonní karty; Náhradní telefonní sluchátka; Rozšiřující a boční moduly pro telefony; Kabely telefonních sluchátek; Držáky a konzole pro telefony; Rozdělovače a adaptéry pro telefony
de: Elektronik > Kommunikationsgeräte > Telefone > Telefonzubehör: Anrufblocker; DSL-Filter; Telefonkarten; Ersatz-Telefonhörer; Telefon-Erweiterungsmodule (Sidecars); Telefonhörer-Kabel; Telefon-Halterungen und -Befestigungen; Telefon-Splitter und -Adapter
en: Electronics > Communications > Telephony > Telephone Accessories: Call Blockers; DSL Filters; Phone Cards; Replacement Telephone Handsets; Telephone Expansion & Sidecar Modules; Telephone Handset Cords; Telephone Mounts & Brackets; Telephone Splitters & Adapters
sv: Elektronik > Kommunikation > Telefoni > Telefontillbehör: Samtalsblockering; DSL-filter; Telefonkort; Ersättningslurar; Telefonexpansions- och sidokarmoduler; Lursladdar; Telefonfästen och konsoler; Telefonförgreningar och adaptrar
fr: Appareil électronique > Communications > Téléphonie > Accessoires pour téléphones: Bloqueurs d’appels; Filtres DSL; Cartes téléphoniques; Combinés de remplacement pour téléphone; Modules d’extension (sidecars) pour téléphone; Cordons de combiné téléphonique; Supports et fixations de téléphone; Séparateurs et adaptateurs téléphoniques
ro-RO: Electronice > Comunicații > Telefonie > Accesorii pentru telefoane: Funcții de blocare a apelurilor; Filtre DSL; Cartele telefonice; Receptoare de schimb pentru telefon; Module de expansiune și laterale pentru telefon; Cabluri pentru receptoare telefonice; Suporturi și console pentru telefon; Splittere și adaptoare pentru telefon
es: Electrónica > Comunicación > Telefonía > Accesorios de telefonía: Bloqueadores de llamadas; Filtros DSL; Tarjetas de teléfono; Auriculares telefónicos de repuesto; Módulos de expansión y sidecar de teléfono; Cables de auricular telefónico; Soportes y abrazaderas de teléfono; Divisores y adaptadores de teléfono
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > การสื่อสาร > การโทรศัพท์ > อุปกรณ์โทรศัพท์: ตัวบล็อกการโทร; ฟิลเตอร์ DSL; การ์ดโทรศัพท์; หูโทรศัพท์ทดแทน; โมดูลขยายและไซด์คาร์โทรศัพท์; สายหูโทรศัพท์; ขาตั้งและแผงยึดโทรศัพท์; ตัวแยกสัญญาณและอะแดปเตอร์โทรศัพท์
lt-LT: Elektronika > Ryšiai > Telefonija > Telefonų priedai: Skambučių blokavimo įrenginiai; DSL filtrai; Telefono kortelės; Atsarginiai telefono rageliai; Telefono plėtiniai ir šoniniai moduliai; Telefono ragelio laidai; Telefono laikikliai ir kronšteinai; Telefono skirstytuvai ir adapteriai
ko: 전자기기 > 통신 > 전화 > 전화기 부대용품: 통화 차단기; DSL 필터; 전화 카드; 교체용 전화기 수화기; 전화기 확장 및 사이드카 모듈; 전화기 수화기 코드; 전화기 마운트 및 브래킷; 전화기 스플리터 및 어댑터
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 通讯 > 电话 > 电话配件: 来电拦截器; DSL 滤波器; 电话卡; 替换电话听筒; 电话扩展与附属模块; 电话听筒线; 电话支架; 电话分线器和适配器
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Comunicações > Telefonia > Acessórios para telefone: Bloqueadores de chamadas; Filtros DSL; Cartões telefônicos; Monofones de telefone de reposição; Módulos de expansão e sidecar para telefone; Cabos de monofone de telefone; Suportes e braçadeiras para telefone; Divisores e adaptadores de telefone